New Jersey, session 221, S4339.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. If a public safety worker, from June 5, 2021 until January 31, 2022, contracts coronavirus disease 2019, the public safety worker shall be entitled to full accidental disability benefits, if the public safety worker: (1) contracts coronavirus disease 2019 during a time period in which the public safety worker is working in a place of employment other than the public safety worker's own residence; (2) is a member of the police; and (3) is permanently and totally disabled as a direct result of contracting coronavirus disease 2019. b.    This act is intended to affirm certain rights of public safety workers under the circumstances specified in this act, and shall not be construed as reducing, limiting, or curtailing any rights of any worker or employee to benefits provided by law. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall be retroactive to June 5, 2021.